Massachusetts, session 194th, S2134.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 3 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following 
section:- 
Section 71. (a) There shall be a permanent commission on the status of people who 
practice Islam consisting of 11 persons as follows: 2 persons appointed by the governor; 1 person 
appointed by the attorney general; 1 person appointed by the speaker of the house of 
representatives; 1 person appointed by the president of the senate; 2 persons appointed by the 
state secretary; 2 persons appointed by the senate chair of the Massachusetts general court’s joint 
committee on racial equity, civil rights, and inclusion; and 2 persons appointed by the house 
chair of the Massachusetts general court’s joint committee on racial equity, civil rights, and 
inclusion. Members of the commission shall reside in the commonwealth who have 

of 5 11 demonstrated a commitment to the Muslim American community. Members shall be subject to 
the provisions of chapter 268A as they apply to special state employees. 
(b) Members shall serve terms of 3 years and until their successors are appointed. 
Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled by the original appointing 
authority for the balance of the unexpired term. Nominations for members shall be solicited by 
the appointing authorities between August 1 and September 16 of each year through an open 
application process using a uniform application that is widely distributed throughout the state. 
(c) The commission shall elect from among its members a chair, a vice chair, a treasurer 
and any other officers it considers necessary. The members of the commission shall receive no 
compensation for their services, provided however, that they shall be reimbursed for any usual 
and customary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. 
(d) The commission shall be a resource to the commonwealth on issues affecting 
American Muslim communities. In furtherance of that responsibility, the commission shall: (1) 
promote research and serve as a clearinghouse and source of information on issues pertaining to 
American Muslims in the commonwealth; (2) inform the public and leaders of business, 
education, human services, health care, state and local governments and the communications 
media of the unique cultural, social, ethnic, economic and educational issues affecting American 
Muslims in the commonwealth; (3) foster unity among the American Muslim community and 
organizations in the commonwealth by promoting cooperation and sharing of information and 
encouraging collaboration and joint activities; (4) serve as a liaison between government and 
private interest groups with regard to matters of unique interest and concern to American 
Muslims in the commonwealth; (5) identify and recommend qualified American Muslims for 

of 5 33 appointive positions at all levels of government, including boards and commissions, as the 
commission considers necessary and appropriate; (6) assess programs and practices in all state 
agencies as they affect American Muslims, as the commission considers necessary and 
appropriate; (7) advise executive and legislative bodies on the potential effect on American 
Muslims of proposed legislation, as the commission considers necessary and appropriate; and (8) 
generally undertake activities designed to enable the commonwealth to realize the full benefit of 
the skills, talents and cultural heritage of American Muslims in the commonwealth. 
(e) The commission shall annually, on or before June 2, report the results of its findings 
and activities of the preceding year and its recommendations to the governor and to the clerks of 
the senate and house of representatives. 
(f) The powers of the commission shall include, but not be limited, to: (1) using the 
voluntary and uncompensated services of private individuals, agencies and organizations that 
may from time to time be offered and needed, including the provision of meeting places and 
refreshments; (2) holding regular, public meetings and holding fact-finding hearings and other 
public forums as it considers necessary; (3) directing staff to perform its duties; (4) establishing 
and maintaining offices that it considers necessary, subject to appropriation; (5) enacting by-laws 
for its own governance that are not inconsistent with any general or special law; and (6) 
recommending policies and making recommendations to agencies and officers of the state and 
local subdivisions of government to effectuate the purposes of subsection (d). 
(g) The commission may request from all state agencies whatever information and 
assistance the commission requires. 

of 5 54  (h) The commission may accept and solicit funds, including any gifts, donations, grants, 
or bequests, or any federal funds for any of the purposes of this section. These funds shall be 
deposited in a separate account with the state secretary’s office, be received by the state secretary 
on behalf of the commonwealth, and be expended by the commission in accordance with law. 
(i) The commission staff shall consist of a paid executive director, employees and 
volunteers who assist the commission in effecting its statutory duties. The commission shall 
appoint the executive director for a term of 3 years. 
Section 72. (a) The commission shall: 
(i) Report on trends and data related to incidents of Islamophobia and discrimination 
against American Muslims in the commonwealth; 
(ii) Identify and evaluate existing efforts to combat Islamophobia and discrimination in 
the commonwealth; 
(iii) Identify best practices from efforts to combat Islamophobia in other states and 
jurisdictions; 
(iv) Evaluate the commonwealth's hate crime statutes and whether any amendments 
would better protect residents from Islamophobia and other similar forms of hatred; 
(v) Recommend implementation strategies, programs, and legislation to combat 
Islamophobia in the commonwealth. 
The commission shall submit a report of its study and recommendations to the clerks of 
the house of representatives and the senate and the senate and house committees on ways and 
means not later than November 30, 2026. 

of 5 75  SECTION 2. Notwithstanding section 1, the initial members of the American Muslim 
commission shall be appointed for the following terms:- 
(a) The governor shall appoint, on or before December, 1, 2026, 2 members, each for a 
term of 3 years. 
(b) The attorney general shall appoint, on or before December 1, 2026, 1 member for a 
term of 3 years. 
(c) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint, on or before December 1, 
2026, 1 member for a term of 3 years. 
(d) The president of the senate shall appoint, on or before December 1 2026, 1 member 
for a term of 3 years. 
(e) The state secretary shall appoint, on or before December 1, 2026, 2 members, each for 
a term of 3 years. 
(f) The chair of the Senate committee on racial equity, civil rights shall appoint, on or 
before December 1, 2026, 2 members, each for a term of 3 years. 
(g) The chair of the House committee on racial equity, civil rights shall appoint, on or 
before December 1, 2026, 2 members, each for a 3 year term. 
SECTION 3. The executive director of the American Muslim commission, established by 
section 1, shall initially be appointed by the commissioners for the term of 3 years on or before 
December 1, 2026. 
SECTION 4. Sections 1 to 3, inclusive, shall take effect on December 1, 2026.